Nebraska, session 109, LB1215.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1215 LB1215
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Political Subdivision Contracting Transparency Act. The act
terminates on July 1, 2030. The act is race neutral and focused on
achieving equitable outcomes through process improvements.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Political Subdivision Contracting
Transparency Act:
(1) Accepted invoice means a properly submitted invoice that meets
all contractual documentation requirements;
(2) Contracting agency means any political subdivision engaged in
procurement of goods, services, or construction;
(3) Mobilization micro-advance means a limited-purpose financing
tool designed to enable small or undercapitalized businesses to begin
work on awarded public contracts;
(4) Prime contractor means any person awarded a contract by a
contracting agency;
(5) Small business vendor means any business that meets the small-
business size standards established under 13 C.F.R. 121, including size
standards based on the North American Industry Classification System
incorporated by reference, or any applicable small-business size standard
adopted by a contracting agency consistent with state law;
(6) Solicitation means any request for bids, request for proposals,
request for qualifications, notice to contractors, or similar
announcement seeking vendor participation in a public contract; and
(7) Subcontractor means any person providing labor, materials, or
services under contract with a prime contractor.
Sec. 3. (1) A contracting agency shall remit full payment to a
prime contractor no later than thirty days after receipt of an accepted
invoice.
(2) A prime contractor shall remit full payment to all
subcontractors no later than seven days after receiving payment from the
contracting agency.
-2-

LB1215 LB1215
2026 2026
(3) Any unpaid amount shall accrue interest at the rate established
under section 45-103.
(4) Any contract clause that delays payment to subcontractors beyond
the timelines in this section is void as against public policy.
Sec. 4. (1) Upon request of any unsuccessful bidder, a contracting
agency shall provide a written or virtual postaward debrief within ten
business days after receipt of such request.
(2) The debrief shall include, at minimum:
(a) Evaluation criteria;
(b) Strengths and weaknesses of the bid;
(c) Aggregate scoring information; and
(d) Any compliance deficiencies affecting award determination.
(3) Nothing in this section shall require disclosure of proprietary
or confidential information submitted by any other bidder.
(4) A contracting agency may withhold a debrief only in cases
involving active litigation or state or federal security restrictions.
Sec. 5. (1) The Department of Administrative Services shall
establish a single, public-facing, searchable, online procurement
calendar listing each solicitation of fifty thousand dollars or more
issued by any contracting agency.
(2) Each contracting agency shall post every solicitation at least
fourteen days prior to the bid due date.
(3) The procurement calendar shall include:
(a) Scope of work;
(b) Pre-bid meeting details;
(c) Due dates;
(d) Contact information; and
(e) Award notifications.
(4) A contracting agency may post any solicitation on its website in
addition to the posting required under this section.
(5) A contracting agency that fails to comply with the posting
-3-

LB1215 LB1215
2026 2026
requirement of this section shall report such failure on or before
December 31 of the calendar year of such failure. Failure to comply with
this posting requirement does not invalidate a contract award.
(6) The Department of Administrative Services shall electronically
provide a report to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature by
February that includes the information provided under this section in the
prior calendar year.
Sec. 6. (1) The Department of Economic Development, in consultation
with the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature, shall develop a
uniform small-business procurement readiness checklist for use by
contracting agencies.
(2) The checklist shall include:
(a) Required registrations;
(b) Insurance and bonding requirements;
(c) Compliance documentation;
(d) Bid-submission requirements;
(e) Project-readiness indicators; and
(f) Availability of a mobilization micro-advance.
(3) The checklist shall be made publicly available.
Sec. 7. The Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature shall
conduct a performance review in 2029 and make recommendations regarding
continuation, modification, or expansion of the Political Subdivision
Contracting Transparency Act.
-4-